Florida, session 2026, HB569.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (9) of section 916.106, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
916.106 Definitions.—For the purposes of this chapter, the
term:
(9) "Forensic client" or "client" means any defendant who
has been committed to the department or agency pursuant to s.
916.13, s. 916.15, or s. 916.302, or s. 916.303(3).
Section 2. Section 916.303, Florida Statutes, is
republished to read:
916.303 Determination of incompetency; dismissal of
charges.—
(1) The charges against any defendant found to be
incompetent to proceed due to intellectual disability or autism
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb569 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 569 2026 Legislature
shall be dismissed without prejudice to the state if the
defendant remains incompetent to proceed within a reasonable
time after such determination, not to exceed 2 years, unless the
court in its order specifies its reasons for believing that the
defendant will become competent to proceed within the
foreseeable future and specifies the time within which the
defendant is expected to become competent to proceed. The
charges may be refiled by the state if the defendant is declared
competent to proceed in the future.
(2) If the charges are dismissed and if the defendant is
considered to lack sufficient capacity to give express and
informed consent to a voluntary application for services and
lacks the basic survival and self-care skills to provide for his
or her well-being or is likely to physically injure himself or
herself or others if allowed to remain at liberty, the agency,
the state attorney, or the defendant's attorney shall apply to
the committing court to involuntarily admit the defendant to
residential services pursuant to s. 393.11.
(3) If the defendant is considered to need involuntary
residential services for reasons described in subsection (2)
and, further, there is a substantial likelihood that the
defendant will injure another person or continues to present a
danger of escape, and all available less restrictive
alternatives, including services in community residential
facilities or other community settings, which would offer an
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb569 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 569 2026 Legislature
opportunity for improvement of the condition have been judged to
be inappropriate, the agency, the state attorney, or the
defendant's counsel may request the committing court to continue
the defendant's placement in a secure facility pursuant to this
part. Any placement so continued must be reviewed by the court
at least annually at a hearing. The annual review and hearing
must determine whether the defendant continues to meet the
criteria described in this subsection and, if so, whether the
defendant still requires involuntary placement in a secure
facility and whether the defendant is receiving adequate care,
treatment, habilitation, and rehabilitation, including
psychotropic medication and behavioral programming. Notice of
the annual review and review hearing shall be given to the state
attorney and the defendant's attorney. A defendant's placement
in a secure facility may not exceed the maximum sentence for the
crime for which the defendant was charged.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb569 -00-er